Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 3.1 Alternative Work Schedules

36-3.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Employees Alternative Work Schedules Act of 1987.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 551, § 1.

36-3.1-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds: that new trends in the use of alternative work schedules in the private sector have proven beneficial to employee and employer alike; that the congress of the United States has recently enacted and the president has signed legislation lending permanence to what had been heretofore an experimental program of alternative work schedules for federal employees; that it has been determined that alternative work schedules provide greater employment opportunities for women with young children; that the fastest growing segment of the work force is the “permanent part-time” work force; that alternative work schedules present greater job opportunity for the unemployed; that many of the fifty (50) states now offer alternative work schedules to their state employees and that the use of alternative work schedules result in improvement in service to the public, employee morale, and efficiency of agency operations. The general assembly therefore finds that there should be optional alternate working schedules available to state employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 551, § 1.

36-3.1-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Alternative work schedules” means a plan of employment which varies the workday, workweek, and work schedules as an alternative to the conventional workweek, while still working the total basic number of hours required of their job. Alternative work schedules include flexitime, compressed workweeks, jobsharing, permanent part-time, and other alternative work plans. Alternative work schedules must first be approved by the appointing authority and reviewed by the personnel administrator.

“Compressed workweek” means a working schedule which compresses the biweekly pay period into less than ten (10) working days.

“Flexible-time employment” or “flexitime” as used in this chapter means employment in which the workday of a full-time employee consists of at least four (4) work hours worked between hours which are specified and known as “core time”, and the remaining hours of which may be worked by the employee, as approved by the supervisor from among hours which are specified as the earliest time an employee may normally start work and the latest time an employee may normally stop work without special arrangements made in advance and known as the “bandwidth” of the workday.

“Job-sharing” means a work plan in which two (2) or more persons share one job, jointly assuming responsibility for the job’s output.

“Permanent part-time” means a work schedule which provides for less than thirty-five (35) hours per week on a nontemporary basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 551, § 1.

36-3.1-4.
Policy.

It is the policy of the state to offer alternative working schedules to state employees, thereby enabling the appointing authority to allow for flexitime, compressed workweeks, job sharing, permanent part-time, and other alternative work plans, provided work schedule changes allow the maintaining of adequate work coverage and service to the public, in an effort to reduce commuter congestion, conserve energy, increase employee morale, increase productivity, and reduce tardiness and absenteeism. Any alternative work plans to insure compliance shall be jointly agreed to by the appointing authority and the certified bargaining representative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 551, § 1.

36-3.1-5.
Schedule.

Not later than January 1, 1988, each state department, board, or commission shall develop and transmit to the division of human resources of the department of administration for review of its plans for the implementation of alternative work schedules following guidelines published by the director of the department of administration. The associate director of the division of human resources shall review all alternative work schedule plans, and may make revisions as necessary for effective implementation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 551, § 1.

36-3.1-6.
Deadline.

Not later than January 1, 1989, all units of state agencies, other than those specifically exempted in the plans approved by the associate director of the division of human resources, shall offer alternative work schedules to their employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 551, § 1.

36-3.1-7.
Exceptions.

Any state department, board, commission, or independent agency may request permission from the associate director of the division of human resources to alter its approved plan or plans as is necessary for the performance of its mission. The associate director of the division of human resources may grant the requests provided every reasonable effort is made to conform with the intent and purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 551, § 1.

36-3.1-8.
Conditions and restrictions.

The request for an alternative work schedule shall be made by written request from either the employee or the exclusive certified bargaining agent. In all cases where an employee is represented by a union, the union shall be notified of all requests which are initiated by an employee. The appointing authority shall review all requests and it shall have the discretionary power to approve or disapprove the request, subject to the associate director of the division of human resources’ review pursuant to §

36-3.1-5

. Where an employee is not represented by an exclusive certified bargaining agent, the appointing authority shall not amend the request for an alternative work schedule without the consent of the employee.

When an employee is represented by an exclusive certified collective bargaining agent, the appointing authority shall not amend the request for an alternate work week schedule without the written agreement of the exclusive certified bargaining agent.

The work week of any occupied full time permanent position shall not be reduced pursuant to this chapter unless by written request of the employee or the exclusive certified bargaining agent as required in subsection (a). In all cases where an employee is represented by an exclusive certified bargaining agent, no alternate work week schedule as defined by this chapter shall be implemented without the written consent of the exclusive certified bargaining agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 551, § 1.